Washington statutes.
RCW 7.80.140

Costs and attorney fees.

Each party to a civil infraction case is responsible for costs incurred by that party, but the court may assess witness fees against a nonprevailing respondent. Attorney fees may be awarded to either party in a civil infraction case.

[ 1987 c 456 s 22.]